New Jersey, session 221, A4948.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and the General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  The following item in section 1 of P.L.2023, c.74, the annual appropriations act for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2024, is amended as follows: 22 DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY AFFAIRS 70 Government Direction, Management, and Control 75 State Subsidies and Financial Aid STATE AID 04-8030  Local Government Services ................................ $2,000,000 Total State Aid appropriation, State Subsidies and Financial Aid ................... $2,000,000 State Aid: 04    Perth Amboy  [Convery Boulevard] Pedestrian [Bridge] Safety (PTRF)............................................................. ($2,000,000) 2.  This act shall take effect immediately.